Hawaii statutes.
§490:2A-107 Waiver or renunciation of claim
or right after default. Any claim or right arising out of an alleged
default or breach of warranty may be discharged in whole or in part without
consideration by a written waiver or renunciation signed and delivered by the
aggrieved party. [L 1991, c 40, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next